Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6114.
people of the state of michigan enact: SUBPART 3 PARAQUAT DICHLORIDE Sec. 14731. (1) Beginning December 1, 2027, a person shall not sell an herbicide that contains paraquat dichloride. (2) Beginning December 1, 2028, a person shall not use as an herbicide a product that contains paraquat dichloride. Sec. 14733. (1) The paraquat dichloride fund is created in the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund and credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (2) On appropriation, the department shall expend money from the fund to do all of the following: (a) Provide grants under the cost-share program described in subsection (3). (b) Provide information and resources about alternative products, processes, and equipment. (c) Provide information and resources regarding the cost-share program described in subsection (3). (3) The department shall promulgate rules in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, to implement a cost-share program to provide grants to agricultural operations to cover the costs of transitioning from herbicides that contain paraquat dichloride to alternative products, and establish all of the following: (a) Eligibility and selection criteria. (b) Application requirements. (c) Eligible alternative products, processes, and equipment. (d) A buy-back program to ensure safe disposal of existing products that contain paraquat dichloride from agricultural operations. (4) The department shall make the information on the cost-share program available on the department's website. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Department" means the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (b) "Fund" means the paraquat dichloride fund created in subsection (1). Sec. 14735. A person that violates section 14731 may be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $10,000.00. A violation of section 14731 may be prosecuted by the prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or by the attorney general.